Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 35. Tennessee River Valley Association

§ 57-35-1.
State membership in Tennessee River Valley Association authorized.

That the Governor of the State of Mississippi be, and he is hereby, authorized and empowered for and on behalf of the State of Mississippi to join the Tennessee River Valley Association and the State of Mississippi may remain a member so long as the expense of such membership does not extend five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) per annum.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 465, eff from and after passage (approved May 21, 1976).